Illinois, session 104th, HB1500.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois-Indiana Boundary Adjustment Commission Participation 6Act.  7    Section 5. Definition. As used in this Act, 8"Illinois-Indiana Boundary Adjustment Commission" has the 9meaning given to the term "Indiana-Illinois Boundary 10Adjustment Commission" in House Bill 1008 of the 124th Indiana 11General Assembly. 12    Section 10. Appointments to the Commission. 13    (a) If and only if House Bill 1008 of the 124th Indiana 14General Assembly becomes law, then, no more than 60 days after 15receiving notice from the Governor of Indiana as described in 16subsection (b) of Section 4 of Chapter 1-3-3 of the Indiana 17Code, the Governor shall appoint 5 members to the 18Illinois-Indiana Boundary Adjustment Commission who are not 19current members of the General Assembly, of which no more than 203 members shall be members of the same political party.21    (b) A member of the Illinois-Indiana Boundary Adjustment 22Commission appointed under this Section shall serve a term of   HB1500- 2 -LRB104 08603 SPS 18655 b14 years and until a successor is appointed and qualified.2    (c) If a vacancy occurs in the membership of the 3Illinois-Indiana Boundary Adjustment Commission, the vacancy 4shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment 5for the remainder of the unexpired term.6    (d) Members of the Illinois-Indiana Boundary Adjustment 7Commission shall serve without compensation or reimbursement. 8    Section 15. Report. No later than 60 days after the 9completion of the Illinois-Indiana Boundary Adjustment 10Commission's duties, the members appointed under Section 10 11shall submit the report described under Section 13 of Chapter 121-3-3 of the Indiana Code to the General Assembly. The members 13may include additional recommendations specific to the State 14of Illinois, including any legislation necessary to implement 15the recommendations of the Illinois-Indiana Boundary 16Adjustment Commission. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.